Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5441.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 102. As used in this act: (a) "Advisory panel" or "panel" means the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency. (b) "Affiliate" means any person that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with; is in a partnership or joint venture relationship with; or is a co-shareholder of a corporation, a co-member of a limited liability company, or a co-partner in a limited liability partnership with a licensee or applicant. (c) "Applicant" means a person who applies for a state operating license. Applicant includes, with respect to disclosures in an application, for purposes of ineligibility for a license under section 402, or for purposes of prior marijuana cannabis regulatory agency approval of a transfer of interest under section 406, and only for applications submitted on or after January 1, 2019, a managerial employee of the applicant, a person holding a direct or indirect ownership interest of more than 10% in the applicant, and the following for each type of applicant: (i) For an individual or sole proprietorship: the proprietor and the proprietor's spouse. (ii) For a partnership and limited liability partnership: all partners and their spouses. For a limited partnership and limited liability limited partnership: all general and limited partners, not including a limited partner holding a direct or indirect ownership interest of 10% or less and who does not exercise control over or participate in the management of the partnership, and their spouses. For a limited liability company: all members and managers, not including a member holding a direct or indirect ownership interest of 10% or less and who does not exercise control over or participate in the management of the company, and their spouses. (iii) For a privately held corporation: all corporate officers or persons with equivalent titles and their spouses, all directors and their spouses, and all stockholders, not including those holding a direct or indirect ownership interest of 10% or less, and their spouses. (iv) For a publicly held corporation: all corporate officers or persons with equivalent titles and their spouses, all directors and their spouses, and all stockholders, not including those holding a direct or indirect ownership interest of 10% or less, and their spouses. (v) For a multilevel ownership enterprise: any entity or person that receives or has the right to receive more than 10% of the gross or net profit from the enterprise during any full or partial calendar or fiscal year. (vi) For a nonprofit corporation: all individuals and entities with membership or shareholder rights in accordance with the articles of incorporation or the bylaws and the spouses of the individuals. (d) "Board" means the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency. (e) "Cannabis regulatory agency" means the marijuana regulatory agency created under Executive Reorganization Order No. 2019-2, MCL 333.27001, renamed the cannabis regulatory agency under Executive Reorganization Order No. 2022-1, MCL 333.27002. (f) (e) "Cutting" means a section of a lead stem or root stock that is used for vegetative asexual propagation. (g) (f) "Department" means the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (h) (g) "Grower" means a licensee that is a commercial entity located in this state that cultivates, dries, trims, or cures and packages marihuana for sale to a processor, provisioning center, or another grower. (i) (h) "Industrial hemp" means that term as defined in section 3 of the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27953. (j) (i) "Industrial hemp research and development act" means the industrial hemp research and development act, 2014 PA 547, MCL 286.841 to 286.859. (k) (j) "Licensee" means a person holding a state operating license. (l) (k) "Marihuana" means that term as defined in section 3 of the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27953. (m) (l) "Marihuana facility" means a location at which a licensee is licensed to operate under this act. (n) (m) "Marihuana plant" means any plant of the species Cannabis sativa L. Marihuana plant does not include industrial hemp. (o) (n) "Marihuana-infused product" means that term as defined in section 3 of the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27953. (p) (o) "Marihuana tracking act" means the marihuana tracking act, 2016 PA 282, MCL 333.27901 to 333.27904. (p) "Marijuana regulatory agency" means the marijuana regulatory agency created under Executive Reorganization Order No. 2019-2, MCL 333.27001. (q) "Michigan medical marihuana act" means the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, 2008 IL 1, MCL 333.26421 to 333.26430. (r) "Municipality" means a city, township, or village. (s) "Paraphernalia" means any equipment, product, or material of any kind that is designed for or used in growing, cultivating, producing, manufacturing, compounding, converting, storing, processing, preparing, transporting, injecting, smoking, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body, marihuana. (t) "Person" means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership, trust, or other legal entity. (u) "Plant" means any living organism that produces its own food through photosynthesis and has observable root formation or is in growth material. (v) "Processor" means a licensee that is a commercial entity located in this state that purchases marihuana from a grower and that extracts resin from the marihuana or creates a marihuana-infused product for sale and transfer in packaged form to a provisioning center or another processor. (w) "Provisioning center" means a licensee that is a commercial entity located in this state that purchases marihuana from a grower or processor and sells, supplies, or provides marihuana to registered qualifying patients, directly or through the patients' registered primary caregivers. Provisioning center includes any commercial property where marihuana is sold at retail to registered qualifying patients or registered primary caregivers. A noncommercial location used by a registered primary caregiver to assist a qualifying patient connected to the caregiver through the department's marihuana registration process in accordance with the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act is not a provisioning center for purposes of this act. (x) "Registered primary caregiver" means a primary caregiver who has been issued a current registry identification card under the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act. (y) "Registered qualifying patient" means a qualifying patient who has been issued a current registry identification card under the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act or a visiting qualifying patient as that term is defined in section 3 of the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, MCL 333.26423. (z) "Registry identification card" means that term as defined in section 3 of the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, MCL 333.26423. (aa) "Rules" means rules promulgated under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency to implement this act. (bb) "Safety compliance facility" means a licensee that is a commercial entity that takes marihuana from a marihuana facility or receives marihuana from a registered primary caregiver, tests the marihuana for contaminants and for tetrahydrocannabinol and other cannabinoids, returns the test results, and may return the marihuana to the marihuana facility. (cc) "Secure transporter" means a licensee that is a commercial entity located in this state that stores marihuana and transports marihuana between marihuana facilities for a fee. (dd) "Seed" means the fertilized, ungerminated, matured ovule, containing an embryo or rudimentary plant, of a marihuana plant that is flowering. (ee) "Seedling" means a marihuana plant that has germinated and has not flowered and is not harvestable. (ff) "State operating license" or, unless the context requires a different meaning, "license" means a license that is issued under this act that allows the licensee to operate as 1 of the following, specified in the license: (i) A grower. (ii) A processor. (iii) A secure transporter. (iv) A provisioning center. (v) A safety compliance facility. (gg) "Statewide monitoring system" or, unless the context requires a different meaning, "system" means an internet-based, statewide database established, implemented, and maintained by the department under the marihuana tracking act, that is available to licensees, law enforcement agencies, and authorized state departments and agencies on a 24-hour basis for all of the following: (i) Verifying registry identification cards. (ii) Tracking marihuana transfer and transportation by licensees, including transferee, date, quantity, and price. (iii) Verifying in commercially reasonable time that a transfer will not exceed the limit that the patient or caregiver is authorized to receive under section 4 of the Michigan Medical Marihuana Act, MCL 333.26424. (hh) "Tissue culture" means a marihuana plant cell, cutting, tissue, or organ, that is kept under a sterile condition on a nutrient culture medium of known composition and that does not have visible root formation. A tissue culture is not a marihuana plant for purposes of a grower. (ii) "Usable marihuana" means the dried leaves, flowers, plant resin, or extract of the marihuana plant, but does not include the seeds, stalks, and roots of the plant. Sec. 302. The board cannabis regulatory agency has general responsibility for implementing this act. The board cannabis regulatory agency has the powers and duties specified in this act and all other powers necessary and proper to fully and effectively implement and administer this act for the purpose of licensing, regulating, and enforcing the licensing and regulation system established under this act for marihuana growth, processing, testing, and transporting. The board cannabis regulatory agency is subject to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. The board's duties of the cannabis regulatory agency include all of the following: (a) Granting or denying each application for a state operating license within a reasonable time. (b) Deciding all license applications in reasonable order. (c) Conducting its public meetings in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (d) Consulting with the department in promulgating Promulgating rules and emergency rules as necessary to implement, administer, and enforce this act. The board shall not promulgate a rule establishing a limit on the number or type of marihuana facility licenses that may be granted. (e) Implementing and collecting the application fee described in section 401 and, in conjunction with the department of treasury, the tax described in section 601 and regulatory assessment described in section 603. (f) Providing for the levy and collection of fines for a violation of this act or rules. (g) Providing oversight of a marihuana facility through the board's inspectors, agents, and auditors of the cannabis regulatory agency and through the state police or attorney general for the purpose of certifying the revenue, receiving complaints from the public, or conducting investigations into the operation of the marihuana facility as the board cannabis regulatory agency considers necessary and proper to ensure compliance with this act and rules and to protect and promote the overall safety, security, and integrity of the operation of a marihuana facility. (h) Providing oversight of marihuana facilities to ensure that marihuana-infused products meet health and safety standards that protect the public to a degree comparable to state and federal standards applicable to similar food and drugs. (i) Reviewing and ruling on any complaint by a licensee regarding any investigative procedures of this state that are believed to be unnecessarily disruptive of marihuana facility operations. The need to inspect and investigate is presumed at all times. The board may delegate authority to hear, review, or rule on licensee complaints to a subcommittee of the board. To prevail on the complaint, a licensee must establish by a preponderance of the evidence that the procedures unreasonably disrupted its marihuana facility operations. (j) Holding at least 2 public meetings each year. Upon 72 hours' written notice to each member, the chairperson or any 2 board members may call a special meeting. Three members of the board constitute a quorum, including when making determinations on an application for a license. Three votes are required in support of final determinations of the board on applications for licenses and all other licensing determinations, except that 4 votes are required in support of a determination to suspend or revoke a license. The board cannabis regulatory agency shall keep a complete and accurate record of all of its meetings and hearings. Upon order of the board, 1 of the board members or cannabis regulatory agency, a hearing officer designated by the board cannabis regulatory agency may conduct any hearing provided for under this act or by rules and may recommend findings and decisions to the board. cannabis regulatory agency. The board member or hearing officer conducting the hearing has all powers and rights regarding the conduct of hearings granted to the board cannabis regulatory agency under this act. The record made at the time of the hearing shall must be reviewed by the board or a majority of the board, cannabis regulatory agency, and the findings and decision of the majority of the board are the order of the board cannabis regulatory agency in the case. (k) Maintaining records that are separate and distinct from the records of any other state board. The records shall must be made available for public inspection subject to the limitations of this act and shall must accurately reflect all board proceedings of the cannabis regulatory agency. (l) Reviewing the patterns of marihuana transfers by the licensees under this act as recorded in a statewide database established for use in administering and enforcing this act and making recommendations to the governor and the legislature in a written annual report to the governor and the legislature and additional reports that the governor requests. The annual report shall must be submitted by April 15 of each year and shall must include the report required under section 702, a statement of receipts and disbursements by the board, cannabis regulatory agency, the actions taken by the board, cannabis regulatory agency, and any additional information and recommendations that the board cannabis regulatory agency considers appropriate or that the governor requests. (m) Except as otherwise provided in this act, all information, records, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, or other data supplied to or used by the board cannabis regulatory agency are subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246, except for the following: (i) Unless presented during a public hearing or requested by the licensee or applicant who is the sole subject of the data, all of the information, records, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, or other data supplied to, created by, or used by the board cannabis regulatory agency related to background investigation of applicants or licensees and to trade secrets, internal controls, and security measures of the licensees or applicants. (ii) All information, records, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, or other data supplied to or used by the board cannabis regulatory agency that have been received from another jurisdiction or local, state, or federal agency under a promise of confidentiality or if the release of the information is otherwise barred by the statutes, rules, or regulations of that jurisdiction or agency or by an intergovernmental agreement. (iii) All information in the statewide monitoring system. Sec. 401. (1) A person may apply to the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency for state operating licenses in the categories of class A, B, or C grower; processor; provisioning center; secure transporter; and safety compliance facility as provided in this act. The application shall must be made under oath on a form provided by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency and shall contain information as prescribed by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) The name, business address, business telephone number, Social Security number, and, if applicable, federal tax identification number of the applicant. (b) The identity of every person having a 2.5% or greater ownership interest in the applicant with respect to which the license is sought. If the disclosed entity is a trust, the application shall disclose the names and addresses of the beneficiaries; if a privately held corporation, the names and addresses of all shareholders, officers, and directors; if a publicly held corporation, the names and addresses of all shareholders holding a direct or indirect interest of greater than 5%, officers, and directors; if a partnership or limited liability partnership, the names and addresses of all partners; if a limited partnership or limited liability limited partnership, the names of all partners, both general and limited; or if a limited liability company, the names and addresses of all members and managers. (c) An identification of any business that is directly or indirectly involved in the growing, processing, testing, transporting, or sale of marihuana, including, if applicable, the state of incorporation or registration, in which an applicant or, if the applicant is an individual, the applicant's spouse, parent, or child has any equity interest. If an applicant is a corporation, partnership, or other business entity, the applicant shall identify any other corporation, partnership, or other business entity that is directly or indirectly involved in the growing, processing, testing, transporting, or sale of marihuana in which it has any equity interest, including, if applicable, the state of incorporation or registration. An applicant may comply with this subdivision by filing a copy of the applicant's registration with the Securities and Exchange Commission if the registration contains the information required by this subdivision. (d) Whether an applicant has been indicted for, charged with, arrested for, or convicted of, pled guilty or nolo contendere to, forfeited bail concerning any criminal offense under the laws of any jurisdiction, either felony or controlled-substance-related misdemeanor, not including traffic violations, regardless of whether the offense has been reversed on appeal or otherwise, including the date, the name and location of the court, arresting agency, and prosecuting agency, the case caption, the docket number, the offense, the disposition, and the location and length of incarceration. (e) Whether an applicant has ever applied for or has been granted any commercial license or certificate issued by a licensing authority in Michigan or any other jurisdiction that has been denied, restricted, suspended, revoked, or not renewed and a statement describing the facts and circumstances concerning the application, denial, restriction, suspension, revocation, or nonrenewal, including the licensing authority, the date each action was taken, and the reason for each action. (f) Whether an applicant has filed, or been served with, a complaint or other notice filed with any public body, regarding the delinquency in the payment of, or a dispute over the filings concerning the payment of, any tax required under federal, state, or local law, including the amount, type of tax, taxing agency, and time periods involved. (g) A statement listing the names and titles of all public officials or officers of any unit of government, and the spouses, parents, and children of those public officials or officers, who, directly or indirectly, own any financial interest in, have any beneficial interest in, are the creditors of or hold any debt instrument issued by, or hold or have any interest in any contractual or service relationship with an applicant. As used in this subdivision, public official or officer does not include a person who would have to be listed solely because of his or her state or federal military service. (h) A description of the type of marihuana facility; anticipated or actual number of employees; and projected or actual gross receipts. (i) Financial information in the manner and form prescribed by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency. (j) A paper copy or electronic posting website reference for the ordinance or zoning restriction that the municipality adopted to authorize or restrict operation of 1 or more marihuana facilities in the municipality. (k) A copy of the notice informing the municipality by registered mail that the applicant has applied for a license under this act. The applicant shall also certify that it has delivered the notice to the municipality or will do so by 10 days after the date the applicant submits the application for a license to the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency. (l) Any other information the department cannabis regulatory agency requires by rule. (2) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall use information provided on the application as a basis to conduct a thorough background investigation on the applicant. A false application is cause for the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency to deny a license. The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall not consider an incomplete application but shall, within a reasonable time, return the application to the applicant with notification of the deficiency and instructions for submitting a corrected application. Information the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency obtains from the background investigation is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (3) An applicant must provide written consent to the inspections, examinations, searches, and seizures provided for in section 303(1)(c)(i) to (iv) and to disclosure to the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency and its agents of otherwise confidential records, including tax records held by any federal, state, or local agency, or credit bureau or financial institution, while applying for or holding a license. Information the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency receives under this subsection is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (4) An applicant must certify that the applicant does not have an interest in any other state operating license that is prohibited under this act. (5) A nonrefundable application fee must be paid at the time of filing to defray the costs associated with the background investigation conducted by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency. The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall set the amount of the application fee for each category and class of license by rule. If the costs of the investigation and processing the application exceed the application fee, the applicant shall pay the additional amount to the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency. All information, records, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, or other data supplied to or used by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency in the course of its review or investigation of an application for a license under this act shall must be disclosed only in accordance with this act. The information, records, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, or other data are not admissible as evidence or discoverable in any action of any kind in any court or before any tribunal, board, agency, or person, except for any action considered necessary by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency. (6) By 10 days after the date the applicant submits an application to the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency, the applicant shall notify the municipality by registered mail that it has applied for a license under this act. (7) This section is subject to sections 402a and 402b. Sec. 402. (1) The marijuana Subject to sections 402a and 402b, the cannabis regulatory agency shall issue a license to an applicant if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The applicant submits a complete application. (b) The applicant pays both the nonrefundable application fee required under section 401(5) and the regulatory assessment established by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency for the first year of operation. (c) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency determines that the applicant is qualified to receive a license under this act. (2) An applicant is ineligible to receive a license if any of the following circumstances exist: (a) The applicant has been convicted of or released from incarceration for a felony under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States within the past 10 years or has been convicted of a controlled substance-related felony within the past 10 years. This subdivision does not apply to a felony for the manufacture, processing, or distribution of marihuana, or possession with the intent to manufacture, process, or distribute marihuana, unless the felony involved the distribution of marihuana to a minor. (b) Within the past 5 years the applicant has been convicted of a misdemeanor involving a controlled substance, theft, dishonesty, or fraud in any state or been found responsible for violating a local ordinance in any state involving a controlled substance, dishonesty, theft, or fraud that substantially corresponds to a misdemeanor in that state. This subdivision does not apply to a misdemeanor or ordinance violation for the possession or use of marihuana. (c) The applicant has knowingly submitted an application for a license under this act that contains false information. (d) The applicant is an employee of the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency. (e) The applicant fails to demonstrate the applicant's ability to maintain adequate premises liability and casualty insurance for its proposed marihuana facility. (f) The applicant holds an elective office of a governmental unit of this state, another state, or the federal government. This subdivision does not apply to an elected officer of or employee of a federally recognized Indian tribe or to an elected precinct delegate. (g) The applicant is a member of or employed by a regulatory body of a governmental unit in this state, another state, or the federal government, or is employed by a governmental unit of this state. This subdivision does not apply to any of the following: (i) An elected officer of or employee of a federally recognized Indian tribe. (ii) An elected precinct delegate. (iii) The spouse of a person who applies for a state operating license unless the spouse's position creates a conflict of interest or is within any of the following: (A) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency. (B) A regulatory body of a governmental unit in this state, another state, or the federal government that makes decisions regarding medical marihuana. (h) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency determines that the applicant is not in compliance with section 205(1). (i) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency determines that the applicant is not in compliance with section 408. (j) The applicant fails to meet other criteria established by rule. (k) Section 402a or 402b prohibits the cannabis regulatory agency from issuing a license to the applicant. (3) In determining whether to grant a license to an applicant, the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency may also consider all of the following: (a) The business probity; financial ability and experience; and responsibility or means to operate or maintain a marihuana facility of the applicant and of any other person that meets either of the following: (i) Controls, directly or indirectly, the applicant. (ii) Is controlled, directly or indirectly, by the applicant or by a person who controls, directly or indirectly, the applicant. (b) The financial ability of the applicant to purchase and maintain adequate liability and casualty insurance. (c) The sources and total amount of the applicant's capitalization to operate and maintain the proposed marihuana facility. (d) Whether the applicant has been indicted for, charged with, arrested for, or convicted of, pled guilty or nolo contendere to, forfeited bail concerning, or had expunged any relevant criminal offense under the laws of any jurisdiction, either felony or misdemeanor, not including traffic violations, regardless of whether the offense has been expunged, pardoned, or reversed on appeal or otherwise. This subdivision does not apply to a criminal offense for the possession, use, manufacture, processing, or distribution of marihuana, or possession with the intent to manufacture, process, or distribute marihuana, unless the felony involved the distribution of marihuana to a minor. (e) Whether the applicant has filed, or had filed against it, a proceeding for bankruptcy within the past 7 years. (f) Whether the applicant has been served with a complaint or other notice filed with any public body regarding payment of any tax required under federal, state, or local law that has been delinquent for 1 or more years. (g) Whether the applicant has a history of noncompliance with any regulatory requirements in this state or any other jurisdiction. (h) Whether at the time of application the applicant is a defendant in litigation involving its business practices. (i) Whether the applicant meets other standards in rules applicable to the license category. (4) Each applicant shall ensure that 1 set of fingerprints is submitted to the department of state police. The applicant shall submit with its application the applicant's written consent to the criminal history check described in this section and the submission of the applicant's fingerprints to, and the inclusion of the applicant's fingerprints in, the state and federal database systems described in subsection (7). (5) The fingerprints required under subsection (4) may be taken by a law enforcement agency or any other person determined by the department of state police to be qualified to take fingerprints. The applicant shall submit a fingerprint processing fee to the department in an amount required under section 3 of 1935 PA 120, MCL 28.273, and any costs imposed by the Federal Bureau of Investigation. (6) The department of state police shall do all of the following: (a) Conduct a criminal history check on each applicant and request the Federal Bureau of Investigation to make a determination of the existence of any national criminal history pertaining to each applicant. (b) Provide the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency with a written report containing the criminal history record information of each applicant. (7) All of the following apply concerning fingerprints submitted to the department of state police under this section: (a) The department of state police shall store and retain all fingerprints submitted under this section in an automated fingerprint identification system database that searches against latent fingerprints, and provides for an automatic notification when a subsequent fingerprint is submitted into the system that matches a fingerprint previously submitted under this section or when the criminal history of an individual whose fingerprints are retained in the system is updated. Upon receiving a notification, the department of state police shall immediately notify the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency. Information in the database maintained under this subsection is confidential, is not subject to disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246, and shall not be disclosed to any person except for purposes of this act or for law enforcement purposes. (b) The department of state police shall forward all fingerprints submitted to it under this section to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for submission of those fingerprints into the FBI automatic notification system. This subdivision does not apply until the department of state police is a participant in the FBI automatic notification system. As used in this subdivision: (i) "Automatic notification system" means a system that stores and retains fingerprints, and that provides for an automatic notification to a participant if and when a fingerprint is submitted into the system that matches an individual whose fingerprints are retained in the system or if and when the criminal history of an individual whose fingerprints are retained in the system is updated. (ii) "FBI automatic notification system" means the automatic notification system that is maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation. (8) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall review all applications for licenses and shall inform each applicant of the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency's decision. (9) A license shall must be issued for a 1-year period and is renewable annually. Except as otherwise provided in this act, the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall renew a license if all of the following requirements are met: (a) The licensee applies to the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency on a renewal form provided by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency that requires information prescribed in rules. (b) The application is received by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency on or before the expiration date of the current license. (c) The licensee pays the regulatory assessment under section 603. (d) The licensee meets the requirements of this act and any other renewal requirements set forth in rules. (10) The department shall notify the licensee by mail or electronic mail at the last known address on file with the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency advising of the time and procedure for paying and the amount of the regulatory assessment under section 603. The failure of the licensee to receive notice under this subsection does not relieve the licensee of the responsibility for renewing the license. (11) If a license renewal application is not submitted by the license expiration date, the license may be renewed within 60 days after its expiration date upon application, payment of the regulatory assessment under section 603, and satisfaction of any renewal requirement and late fee set forth in rules. The licensee may continue to operate during the 60 days after the license expiration date if the license is renewed by the end of the 60-day period. (12) License expiration does not terminate the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency's authority to impose sanctions on a licensee whose license has expired. (13) In its decision on an application for renewal, the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall consider any specific written input it receives from an individual or entity within the local unit of government in which the applicant for renewal is located. (14) A licensee must consent in writing to inspections, examinations, searches, and seizures that are permitted under this act and must provide a handwriting exemplar, fingerprints, photographs, and information as authorized in this act or by rules. (15) An applicant or licensee has a continuing duty to provide information requested by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency and to cooperate in any investigation, inquiry, or hearing conducted by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency. Sec. 402a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), beginning on January 1, 2026, the cannabis regulatory agency shall not issue a provisioning center license if doing so would, within the municipality where the proposed provisioning center will be located, result in there being more than 1 provisioning center for every 5,000 residents of the municipality. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply to either of the following: (a) The renewal of a provisioning center license under section 402(9). (b) A provisioning center license that is transferred to another person in accordance with section 406 and the rules, regardless of whether the other person is required to submit an application to obtain the provisioning center license or is issued a new provisioning center license as a result of the transfer. (3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), beginning on January 1, 2026, the cannabis regulatory agency shall not approve an application for a state operating license or issue a state operating license to an applicant. (4) Subsection (3) does not apply to any of the following: (a) A state operating license for a provisioning center or a class A grower. (b) The renewal of a state operating license under section 402(9). (c) A state operating license that is transferred to another person in accordance with section 406 and the rules, regardless of whether the other person is required to submit an application to obtain the state operating license or is issued a new state operating license as a result of the transfer. (d) A complete application for a state operating license that was submitted before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (e) An application to obtain prequalification status under the rules. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 597 or House Bill No. 5442 (request no. H01728'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05063'25) or House Bill No. 5443 (request no. H05063'25). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05064'25) or House Bill No. 5444 (request no. H05064'25).